California, session 20252026, AB1822.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17016 of the Education Code is amended to read:17016. (a) The board, by the adoption of rules, may establish priorities for the construction and leasing of projects to those school districts the pupils of which will benefit most. The priorities for projects may include an efficient response to extreme heat and climate change. The board may make exceptions from established priorities when it determines that to do so will benefit the pupils affected.(1) If the board adopts priorities related to an efficient response to extreme heat and climate change, those priorities shall apply only to project applications received after January 1, 2027.(2) The board may make exceptions from established priorities when it determines that to do so will benefit the pupils affected.(b) The board may adopt rules establishing priorities for the acquisition and leasing of portable classrooms to county superintendents of schools that will most benefit pupils needing a county community school. The board shall require each county superintendent of schools who leases portable classrooms pursuant to Section 17017.2 to demonstrate that the portable classrooms are utilized solely for operation of a county community school.